test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_vaanis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - väänis: # 
    väänis+A+Sg+Nom: väänis
    väänis+A+Attr: väni
    väänis+A+Sg+Gen: váánnás
    väänis+A+Sg+Acc: váánnás
    väänis+A+Sg+Ill: vánásân
    väänis+A+Sg+Loc: vánásist
    väänis+A+Sg+Com: vánásáin
    väänis+A+Sg+Abe: váánnásttáá
    väänis+A+Ess: vänisin
    väänis+A+Par: vänisid
    väänis+A+Pl+Nom: vánáseh
    väänis+A+Pl+Gen: vánásij
    väänis+A+Pl+Acc: vánásijd
    väänis+A+Pl+Ill: vánásáid
    väänis+A+Pl+Loc: vánásijn
    väänis+A+Pl+Com: [vánásijguin, vánásijgijn]
    väänis+A+Pl+Abe: vánásijttáá

    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vánásub
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: vánásub
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: vánásub
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: vánásuubon
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: vánásubboost
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: vánásubboin
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: vánásubttáá
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: vánásuboh
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: vánásuboi
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: vánásuboid
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: vánásubboid
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: vánásuboin
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [vánásuboiguin, vánásuboigijn]
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: vánásuboittáá
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: vánásubbon
    väänis+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: vánásubbod

    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vánásumos
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: vánásumos
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: vánásumos
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: vánásumosân
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: vánásumosist
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: vánásumosáin
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: vánásumosttáá
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: vánásumoseh
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: vánásumosij
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: vánásumosijd
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: vánásumosáid
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: vánásumosijn
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [vánásumosijguin, vánásumosijgijn]
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: vánásumosijttáá
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: vánásumosin
    väänis+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: vánásumosid
